ru_RU.aff
SFX U Y 130
SFX U   вать  ю           авать
SFX U   вать  ём          авать
SFX U   вать  ёшь         авать
SFX U   вать  ёте         авать
SFX U   вать  ёт          авать
SFX U   вать  ют          авать
SFX U   ваться юсь         аваться
SFX U   ваться ёмся        аваться
SFX U   ваться ёшься       аваться
SFX U   ваться ётесь       аваться
SFX U   ваться ётся        аваться
SFX U   ваться ются        аваться
SFX U   евать ую          [жшщчц]евать
SFX U   евать уем         [жшщчц]евать
SFX U   евать уешь        [жшщчц]евать
SFX U   евать уете        [жшщчц]евать
SFX U   евать ует         [жшщчц]евать
SFX U   евать уют         [жшщчц]евать
SFX U   еваться уюсь        [жшщчц]еваться
SFX U   еваться уемся       [жшщчц]еваться
SFX U   еваться уешься      [жшщчц]еваться
SFX U   еваться уетесь      [жшщчц]еваться
SFX U   еваться уется       [жшщчц]еваться
SFX U   еваться уются       [жшщчц]еваться
SFX U   евать юю          [^жшщчц]евать
SFX U   евать юем         [^жшщчц]евать
SFX U   евать юешь        [^жшщчц]евать
SFX U   евать юете        [^жшщчц]евать
SFX U   евать юет         [^жшщчц]евать
SFX U   евать юют         [^жшщчц]евать
SFX U   еваться ююсь        [^жшщчц]еваться
SFX U   еваться юемся       [^жшщчц]еваться
SFX U   еваться юешься      [^жшщчц]еваться
SFX U   еваться юетесь      [^жшщчц]еваться
SFX U   еваться юется       [^жшщчц]еваться
SFX U   еваться юются       [^жшщчц]еваться
SFX U   овать ую          овать
SFX U   овать уем         овать
SFX U   овать уешь        овать
SFX U   овать уете        овать
SFX U   овать ует         овать
SFX U   овать уют         овать
SFX U   оваться уюсь        оваться
SFX U   оваться уемся       оваться
SFX U   оваться уешься      оваться
SFX U   оваться уетесь      оваться
SFX U   оваться уется       оваться
SFX U   оваться уются       оваться
SFX U   ть    ю           [^аеоу]ять
SFX U   ять   ю           [аеоу]ять
SFX U   ть    ем          [^аеоу]ять
SFX U   ять   ем          [аеу]ять
SFX U   ять   им          оять
SFX U   ть    ешь         [^аеоу]ять
SFX U   ять   ешь         [аеу]ять
SFX U   ять   ишь         оять
SFX U   ть    ете         [^аеоу]ять
SFX U   ять   ете         [аеу]ять
SFX U   ять   ите         оять
SFX U   ть    ет          [^аеоу]ять
SFX U   ять   ет          [аеу]ять
SFX U   ять   ит          оять
SFX U   ть    ют          [^аеоу]ять
SFX U   ять   ют          [аеу]ять
SFX U   ть    т           оять
SFX U   ться  юсь         [^аеоу]яться
SFX U   яться юсь         [аеоу]яться
SFX U   ться  емся        [^аеоу]яться
SFX U   яться емся        [аеу]яться
SFX U   яться имся        ояться
SFX U   ться  ешься       [^аеоу]яться
SFX U   яться ешься       [аеу]яться
SFX U   яться ишься       ояться
SFX U   ться  етесь       [^аеоу]яться
SFX U   яться етесь       [аеу]яться
SFX U   яться итесь       ояться
SFX U   ться  ется        [^аеоу]яться
SFX U   яться ется        [аеу]яться
SFX U   яться ится        ояться
SFX U   ться  ются        [^аеоу]яться
SFX U   яться ются        [аеу]яться
SFX U   ься   ся          ояться
SFX U   ать   у           [жшщч]ать
SFX U   аться усь         [жшщч]аться
SFX U   ать   им          [жшщч]ать
SFX U   аться имся        [жшщч]аться
SFX U   ать   ишь         [жшщч]ать
SFX U   аться ишься       [жшщч]аться
SFX U   ать   ите         [жшщч]ать
SFX U   аться итесь       [жшщч]аться
SFX U   ать   ит          [жшщч]ать
SFX U   аться ится        [жшщч]аться
SFX U   ть    т           [жшщч]ать
SFX U   ься   ся          [жшщч]аться
SFX U   ать   у           дать
SFX U   аться усь         даться
SFX U   ать   ём          дать
SFX U   аться ёмся        даться
SFX U   ать   ёшь         дать
SFX U   аться ёшься       даться
SFX U   ать   ёте         дать
SFX U   аться ётесь       даться
SFX U   ать   ёт          дать
SFX U   аться ётся        даться
SFX U   ать   ут          дать
SFX U   аться утся        даться
SFX U   чь    гу          чь
SFX U   чься  гусь        чься
SFX U   чь    жём         чь
SFX U   чься  жёмся       чься
SFX U   чь    жёшь        чь
SFX U   чься  жёшься      чься
SFX U   чь    жёте        чь
SFX U   чься  жётесь      чься
SFX U   чь    жёт         чь
SFX U   чься  жётся       чься
SFX U   чь    гут         чь
SFX U   чься  гутся       чься
SFX U   уть   у           уть
SFX U   ться  сь          уться
SFX U   уть   ём          уть
SFX U   уться ёмся        уться
SFX U   уть   ёшь         уть
SFX U   уться ёшься       уться
SFX U   уть   ёте         уть
SFX U   уться ётесь       уться
SFX U   уть   ёт          уть
SFX U   уться ётся        уться
SFX U   ть    т           уть
SFX U   ься   ся          уться

SFX W Y 28
SFX W   ить   лю          [бвмпф]ить
SFX W   иться люсь        [бвмпф]иться
SFX W   дить  жу          дить
SFX W   диться жусь        диться
SFX W   ить   ю           [аелнору]ить
SFX W   иться юсь         [аелнору]иться
SFX W   ить   у           [жчшщ]ить
SFX W   иться усь         [жчшщ]иться
SFX W   зить  жу          зить
SFX W   зиться жусь        зиться
SFX W   сить  шу          сить
SFX W   ситься шусь        ситься
SFX W   тить  чу          [^аеиоуыэюясч]тить
SFX W   стить щу          стить
SFX W   титься чусь        [^аеиоуыэюясч]титься
SFX W   ститься щусь        ститься
SFX W   ть    м           ить
SFX W   ться  мся         иться
SFX W   ть    шь          ить
SFX W   ться  шься        иться
SFX W   ь     е           ить
SFX W   ься   есь         иться
SFX W   ть    т           ить
SFX W   ься   ся          иться
SFX W   ить   ят          [^жчшщ]ить
SFX W   иться ятся        [^жчшщ]иться
SFX W   ить   ат          [жчшщ]ить
SFX W   иться атся        [жчшщ]иться
