ru_RU.dic
агрегатировать/LQU
актёрствовать/LQU
ампутировать/LQRTU
антрепренёрствовать/LQU
ассимилироваться/LQRU
баллотироваться/LQTU
белиться/BLPW
беречься/U
блаженствовать/LQTU
боготворить/BLPW
ботанизировать/LQU
бубнить/BLPW
буйствовать/LQTU
валять/BLPU
вариться/BLPW
вербоваться/LQTU
веселить/BLPW
взвалить/BLRW
взволновать/LRTU
взмылиться/LRW
вильнуть/BLRU
вкатиться/LRW
влюбиться/BLRW
внедрять/BLPU
возбудить/BLRW
возликовать/LRU
возложить/BLRW
волочить/BLPW
воротить/BLRW
ворчать/LTU
воссоединить/LRW
востребовать/LRTU
вразумляться/BLPU
вредить/BLPW
вспомнить/BLRW
встряхнуть/BLRU
втащиться/BLRW
вываляться/BLRU
выверить/LRW
выдворить/BLRW
выклевать/LRU
выклинить/BLRW
выкурить/BLRW
выместить/BLRW
выполнить/BLRW
выполнять/BLPU
выразиться/BLRW
высвободить/BLRW
выстудить/BLRW
вытатуировать/LRTU
выутюжить/LRW
вычиститься/BLRW
газифицировать/LQRTU
героизировать/LQU
гнусавить/LPTW
гнуть/BLU
готовить/LPTW
гримироваться/LQTU
грузить/BLPW
дебютировать/LQRTU
дезориентироваться/LQRU
демобилизоваться/LQRTU
держать/LTU
дивить/BLPW
диктаторствовать/LQU
дистиллировать/LQTU
договорить/BLRW
догуляться/LRU
докупить/BLRW
домчать/LRTU
доплатить/LRW
дотащить/BLRW
доторговаться/LRU
дружить/BLPW
европеизировать/LQU
ерепениться/LPTW
жмурить/LPTW
заарендовать/LRU
забинтовать/LRTU
заботить/LPW
завербовать/LRTU
заводить/BLPW
загипнотизировать/LRTU
заговорить/BLRW
загрузить/BLRW
задаваться/BLPU
задушиться/LRW
зазимовать/LRU
закадрить/LRW
заковылять/BLRU
закоптить/BLRW
закуковать/LRU
закупорить/LRTW
заманить/BLRW
замерять/BLPU
заморочить/LRTW
заноситься/BLPW
запаниковать/LRU
заполнять/BLPU
заправить/LRTW
запрячься/U
зарастить/BLRW
засиять/BLRU
заскользить/BLRW
застить/LPW
застояться/LRU
затаиться/BLRW
затормошить/LRW
затрамбовать/LRTU
заучиться/LRW
зацеловать/LRTU
зачинить/BLRW
зашунтировать/LRTU
заявиться/BLRW
злоупотреблять/BLPU
избороздить/LRW
извиняться/BLPU
издырявить/LRW
измериться/LRTW
изнасиловать/LTU
изранить/LRTW
изумляться/BLPU
импортировать/LQTU
инкассировать/LQU
интервьюировать/LQTU
исказить/BLRW
искоренять/BLPU
испариться/BLRW
исправляться/BLPU
истончить/LRW
казниться/BLPW
калибровать/LQTU
катапультировать/LQTU
кипятить/BLPW
ковырнуть/BLRU
колонизовать/LQU
компрометировать/LQTU
консультировать/LQTU
контрить/LPW
копировать/LQTU
корчиться/BLPW
крейсировать/LQU
кривить/BLPW
кульминировать/LQU
купить/BLRW
лаять/LPTU
лечиться/BLPW
линеаризовать/LQRU
лущить/BLPW
лютовать/LQTU
маркировать/LQTU
мелькнуть/BLRU
мерить/LPTW
минимизировать/LQTU
монополизировать/LQTU
морить/BLPW
мусолиться/LPW
мутировать/LQTU
навалить/BLRW
нагадить/LRTW
нагнуться/BLRU
надивиться/BLRW
надышать/LRU
накалить/BLRW
накренить/BLRW
накричаться/LRTU
намагнитить/LRTW
намучиться/LRW
напомадиться/LRW
напрячься/U
напялить/LRTW
насладить/BLRW
настранствоваться/LRU
наступить/BLRW
натурализоваться/LQRTU
нахамить/BLRW
нашарить/LRTW
недослышать/LRU
носиться/BLPW
ночевать/LQTU
обводнить/LRW
обдавать/BLPU
обеззвучить/LRTW
обессмертить/LRW
облагородить/LRTW
облизнуть/BLRU
обломить/BLRW
обновить/BLRW
обобществлять/LPU
оборониться/LRW
обрадовать/LRTU
обручиться/BLRW
обсушить/BLRW
обуять/LU
объегорить/LRW
оголить/BLRW
оделять/BLPU
одобрить/BLRW
озадачить/LRTW
ознаменовать/LRTU
окарикатурить/LRW
окропить/BLRW
окрыляться/LPU
омочить/LRW
опломбировать/LRTU
опозориться/LRTW
определяться/BLPU
опредметить/LRW
орнаментировать/LQRU
осветить/BLRW
оскопить/LRW
осложнять/BLPU
осрамить/BLRW
осчастливить/LRTW
отбраковать/LRTU
отвалиться/BLRW
отгрузить/BLRW
отдаляться/BLPU
отколотить/BLRW
откомандировать/LRTU
откусить/BLRW
отмерить/LRTW
отмерять/BLPU
отпарить/LRTW
отпраздновать/LRTU
отрепетировать/LRTU
отрубиться/LRW
отставлять/BLPU
отстраниться/BLRW
оттитровать/LRTU
отучить/BLRW
отшатнуться/BLRU
отшутиться/BLRW
охранить/LRW
охраняться/BLPU
оштукатурить/LRTW
пановать/LU
паспортизовать/LQRU
перебазироваться/LQRTU
переборщить/BLRW
перевозбудиться/LRW
перегоняться/LPU
перегрузить/BLRW
перезаложить/LRW
перекалять/LPU
переключить/BLRW
перекурить/BLRW
перемахнуть/BLRU
перемолвиться/BLRW
переоборудовать/LRTU
переопределить/BLRW
перепортить/LRW
перепробовать/LRTU
пересластить/LRW
переставать/BLPU
перетрудиться/BLRW
переформировать/LRU
перецепить/BLRW
перлюстрировать/LQU
планировать/LQTU
плодить/BLPW
побояться/LRTU
побудить/BLRW
поворотить/BLRW
повторять/BLPU
погноить/BLRW
подбавить/LRTW
подгулять/LRU
поддразнить/BLRW
подкатить/BLRW
подменять/BLPU
подморозить/LRW
подрегулировать/LRTU
подсобить/BLRW
подстричься/U
подчистить/BLRW
позаимствовать/LRTU
покалечить/LRTW
поковырять/BLRU
покурить/BLRW
политиканствовать/LQTU
пометить/LRTW
помолчать/LRTU
понуриться/LRTW
попечительствовать/LQU
попустительствовать/LQTU
породить/BLRW
посеять/LRTU
поспорить/LRTW
постоять/LRTU
потратить/LRTW
потреблять/BLPU
похристосоваться/LRU
пошевелиться/BLRW
пояснять/BLPU
представать/LPU
преклонить/BLRW
препарировать/LQTU
приветствоваться/LQU
приводиться/LPW
прикнопить/LRW
приколдовать/LRU
примочить/LRW
примчать/LRU
припустить/BLRW
прислоняться/BLPU
пристыдить/BLRW
присутствовать/LQRTU
приходовать/LQTU
прицепить/BLRW
пробоваться/LQTU
проварить/BLRW
проворчать/LRU
продаваться/LPU
продырявить/LRTW
продыхнуть/LRU
прокалибровать/LRTU
прологарифмировать/LRTU
проложить/BLRW
пронумеровать/LRTU
просветиться/BLRW
просеять/LRTU
простоять/LRTU
протащиться/BLRW
проткнуть/BLRU
прошлифовать/LRU
прудить/BLPW
публиковаться/LQTU
разархивировать/LRTU
разветвить/LRW
развоеваться/LRU
раздавать/BLPU
раздразнить/BLRW
разминуться/LRU
разниться/BLPW
разукрупнять/LPU
разучиться/LRW
расковырять/BLRU
раскрошить/BLRW
располосовать/LRU
распустить/BLRW
распылять/BLPU
расстегнуться/BLRU
растопить/BLRW
расфокусировать/LRTU
расчихвостить/LRW
расщеплять/BLPU
революционизировать/LQU
резонёрствовать/LQU
репетировать/LQTU
рисковать/LQTU
русифицировать/LQTU
рядиться/BLPW
самоустраняться/LPU
свернуться/BLRU
светиться/BLPW
сдержать/LRTU
серебрить/BLPW
символизировать/LQU
сконцентрировать/LRTU
скрасить/LRTW
слукавить/LRW
смыслить/BLPW
соболезновать/LQU
сообразить/BLRW
соприкоснуться/BLRU
спикировать/LRTU
сплотиться/BLRW
ссутулиться/LRW
стабилизировать/LQTU
структурировать/LQTU
стыдиться/BLPW
сыпануть/BLRU
табанить/LW
толкнуться/BLRU
торопить/BLPW
тусоваться/LQU
убавить/LRTW
угоститься/BLRW
удержаться/LRTU
уединить/LRW
уложиться/BLRW
умаяться/LRU
упарить/LRTW
уравняться/BLRU
усладить/BLRW
утаить/BLRW
утеплять/BLPU
учить/BLPW
фантазировать/LQTU
фраппировать/LQU
хоронить/BLPW
центрировать/LQTU
шалить/BLPW
швыряться/BLPU
штрафовать/LQTU
электрифицировать/LQU
